Missouri, session 2026, HB3202.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 590.030, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 590.030, to read as follows:
590.030. 1. The POST commission shall establish minimum standards for the basic
training of peace officers. Such standards may vary for each class of license established
pursuant to subsection 2 of section 590.020.
2. The director shall establish minimum age[, citizenship,] and general education
requirements and may require a qualifying score on a certification examination as conditions
of eligibility for a peace officer license. Such general education requirements shall require
completion of a high school program of education under chapter 167 or obtainment of a
General Educational Development (GED) certificate.
3. The director shall provide for the licensure, with or without additional basic
training, of peace officers possessing credentials by other states or jurisdictions, including
federal and military law enforcement officers.
4. The director shall establish a procedure for obtaining a peace officer license and
shall issue the proper license when the requirements of this chapter have been met.
5. As conditions of licensure, all licensed peace officers shall:
(1) Obtain continuing law enforcement education pursuant to rules to be promulgated
by the POST commission;
(2) Be legally authorized to work in the United States under federal law;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3202 2
(3) Maintain a current address of record on file with the director; and
[(3)] (4) Submit to being fingerprinted on or before January 1, 2022, and at any time a
peace officer is commissioned with a different law enforcement agency, for the purposes of a
criminal history background check and enrollment in the state and federal Rap Back
programs, pursuant to section 43.540. The criminal history background check shall include
the records of the Federal Bureau of Investigation. The resulting report shall be forwarded to
the officer's commissioning law enforcement agency at the time of enrollment and Rap Back
enrollment shall be for the purpose of the requirements of subsection 3 of section 590.070 and
subsection 2 of section 590.118. An officer shall take all necessary steps to maintain
enrollment in Rap Back at all law enforcement agencies where the officer is commissioned
for as long as the officer is commissioned with a law enforcement agency or that agency.
6. A peace officer license shall automatically expire if the licensee fails to hold a
commission as a peace officer for a period of five consecutive years, provided that the POST
commission shall provide for the relicensure of such persons and may require retraining as a
condition of eligibility for relicensure, and provided that the director may provide for the
continuing licensure, subject to restrictions, of persons who hold and exercise a law
enforcement commission requiring a peace officer license but not meeting the definition of a
peace officer pursuant to this chapter.
7. All law enforcement agencies shall enroll in the state and federal Rap Back
programs on or before January 1, 2022, and continue to remain enrolled. The law
enforcement agency shall take all necessary steps to maintain officer enrollment for all
officers commissioned with that agency in the Rap Back programs. An officer shall submit to
being fingerprinted at any law enforcement agency upon commissioning and for as long as
the officer is commissioned with that agency.
✔